Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1726
Marketing plan; seller; use of certain phrases; prohibited.

In selling, leasing, or offering to sell or lease a seller-assisted marketing plan in this state, sellers of such plans shall not:

(1) Use the phrase buy-back or secured investment or similar phrase orally or in writing when soliciting, offering, leasing, or selling a seller-assisted marketing plan if the security is the value of the equipment, supplies, products, or services supplied by the seller to the purchaser; or

(2) Use the phrase buy-back or secured investment or similar phrase orally or in writing when soliciting, offering, leasing, or selling a seller-assisted marketing plan unless there are no restrictions or qualifications whatsoever preventing or limiting a purchaser from being able to invoke the buy-back or secured portion of the seller-assisted marketing plan contract at any time the purchaser desires during the one-year period following the contract date.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 26.